Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6352.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 19. (1) The state authority may borrow money and issue bonds or notes for the following purposes: (a) To provide sufficient funds for achieving the state authority's purposes and objectives or incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out the state authority's purposes and objectives, including necessary administrative costs. (b) To refund bonds or notes of the state authority issued under this act, by the issuance of new bonds, whether or not the bonds or notes to be refunded have matured or are subject to prior redemption or are to be paid, redeemed, or surrendered at the time of the issuance of when the refunding bonds or notes ; are issued, and to issue bonds or notes partly to refund the bonds or notes and partly for any other purpose provided for by allowed under this section. (c) To pay do any of the following: (i) Pay the costs of issuance of bonds or notes under this act. ; to pay (ii) Pay interest on bonds or notes becoming payable before the receipt of the first revenues available for payment of that interest as determined by the authority board. ; and to establish, (iii) Establish, in full or in part, a reserve for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds or notes in the amount determined by the authority board. (2) The bonds and notes, including, but not limited to, commercial paper, shall must be authorized by resolution adopted by the authority board, shall must bear the date or dates, and shall must mature at the time or times not exceeding 50 years from the date of issuance, as provided in the resolution. may provide. The bonds and notes shall may bear interest at the rate or rates as may be set, reset, or calculated from time to time, or may bear no interest, as provided in the resolution. The bonds and notes shall must be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be transferable, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of prior redemption at the option of the state authority or the holders of the bonds and notes as provided in the resolution. or resolutions may provide. The bonds and notes of the state authority may be sold at public or private sale at the price or prices determined by the state authority. Bonds and notes may be sold at a discount. (3) Bonds or notes may be 1 or more of the following: (a) Made the subject of a put or agreement to repurchase by the state authority or others. (b) Secured by a letter of credit or by any other collateral that the resolution may authorize.authorizes. (c) Reissued by the state authority once reacquired by the state authority pursuant to any in accordance with a put or repurchase agreement. (4) The state authority may authorize by resolution any member of the board to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Sell and deliver, and receive payment for, notes or bonds or notes. (b) Refund notes or bonds or notes by the delivery of new notes or bonds or notes whether or not the notes or bonds or notes to be refunded have matured, are subject to prior redemption, or are to be paid, redeemed, or surrendered at the time of the issuance of when refunding bonds or notes are issued. (c) Deliver notes or bonds or notes, partly to refund notes or bonds or notes and partly for any other authorized purposes. (d) Buy notes or bonds or notes issued at not more than the face value of the notes or bonds or notes. (e) Approve interest rates or methods for fixing interest rates, prices, discounts, maturities, principal amounts, denominations, dates of issuance, interest payment dates, redemption rights at the option of the state authority or the holder, the place of delivery and payment, and other matters and procedures necessary to complete the transactions authorized. (5) Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the state authority, every issue of its notes or bonds shall be the state authority's bonds or notes is a general obligations obligation of the state authority payable out of revenues, properties, or money of the state authority, subject only to agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds or notes pledging particular receipts, revenues, properties, or money as security for the notes or bonds or notes. (6) The notes or bonds or notes of the state authority are negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, subject only to the provisions of the notes or bonds or notes for registration. (7) Bonds or notes issued by the state authority are not subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. The issuance of bonds and notes under this act is subject to the agency financing reporting act, 2002 PA 470, MCL 129.171 to 129.177. The bonds or notes issued by the state authority are not required to be registered. A filing of a bond or note of the state authority is not required under the uniform securities act, 1964 PA 265, MCL 451.501 to 451.818.uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703. (8) A bond or note issued by the state authority shall must contain on its the face of the bond or note a statement to the effect that the state authority is obligated to pay the principal of and the interest on the bond or note only from revenue or funds of the state authority pledged for the payment of principal and interest, and that this state is not obligated to pay that principal and interest, and that neither the faith and credit nor or the taxing power of this state is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bond or note. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.